Utah, session 2026, HB468.
Section 1. Section 31A-22-630.1 is enacted to read:31A-22-630.1. Mobile mammography screening coverage.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Approved mobile mammography unit" means a mobile mammography bus or vehicle that is:(i)equipped with mammography equipment to perform a mobile mammography screening; and(ii)approved by an accrediting body designated by the federal Food and Drug Administration to perform mammography screenings.(b)"Rural area" means a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class as classified under Section 17-60-104.(2)A health benefit plan that covers a mammography screening shall provide coverage of a mobile mammography screening if the mobile mammography screening is performed:(a)by an approved mobile mammography unit; and(b)in a rural area.(3)Coverage described in Subsection (2) shall reimburse the approved mobile mammography unit at the same rate that a health benefit plan reimburses for an in-network mammography screening performed in another setting.(4)An approved mobile mammography unit:(a)shall accept the amount reimbursed in Subsection (3) and any applicable enrollee cost sharing as payment in full; and(b)may only provide mammography screening services for an enrollee in accordance with the United States Preventative Services Task Force Guidelines on age and frequency.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on January 1, 2027.